Texas, session 892, HB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 63.0101(a), Election Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The following documentation is an acceptable form of photo identification under this chapter: (1)  a driver's license, election identification certificate, or personal identification card issued to the voter [person] by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation; (2)  a United States military identification card that contains the voter's [person's] photograph that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation; (3)  a United States citizenship certificate issued to the voter [person] that contains the voter's [person's] photograph; (4)  a United States passport book or card issued to the voter [person] that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation; [or] (5)  a license to carry a handgun issued to the voter [person] by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation; (6)  an official Native American identification card or tribal document that: (A)  contains the voter's photograph and address; and (B)  is issued by a tribal organization or by a tribe that is federally recognized and located in this state; (7)  an identification card issued by a public or private institution of higher education located in this state that contains the voter's photograph; or (8)  an identification card issued by a state agency of this state that contains the voter's photograph. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.